apertium-eu-hu.eu.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

+N +Po +Cm +Punct +Adv +A +CLB +CC
+Abs +Dat +Ins +Soc +Erg +Ine +Ben +Ben2 +Par +All +Abl +Ela +GenL +GenP +Term +Ten
+Mal +Fem +Sur +Plc +Org
+Art +Interr
+Fut
+Ord
+Locp
+Ben2
+PGen
+LGen
+Mgg
+XXX
+Prop
+Biz

+Comp
+Superl

+Der/N	+ko 

+Dim
+Pl
+Sg

+Pron
+Pers +Dem +Poss +Indef +Interr

+Num

+V +Root +Prc +Cont
+Aux
+ifl
+ifl/f
+ifl/m
+Ind
+Prs
+Prt
+Cond
+Concl
+Pot
+Caus
+Abs/Sg1
+Abs/Sg2
+Abs/Sg3
+Abs/Pl1
+Abs/Pl2
+Abs/Pl3
+Dat/Sg1
+Dat/Sg2
+Dat/Sg3
+Dat/Pl1
+Dat/Pl2
+Dat/Pl3
+Erg/Sg1
+Erg/Sg2
+Erg/Sg2
+Erg/Sg2
+Erg/Sg3
+Erg/Pl1
+Erg/Pl2
+Erg/Pl3

+Sg1
+Sg2
+Sg3

+Sub +Temp +Rel

%>

%{t%}

+Thcase_Abs +Thcase_Ela +Thcase_Dat +Thcase_Ine +Incase_Soc +Thsyn_Subj +Thsyn_Obj +Thsem_Ani +Thsem_Time
+Agcase_Erg +Agsyn_Subj +Agsem_Ani +Agsem_Hum

+Pacase_Abs +Pasyn_Obj +Pasem_Ani
+Locase_Ine +Locase_Ala +Locase_Abl +Locase_Dat +Losyn_Advl
+Prcase_Abs +Prcase_Soc
+Tocase_Abs +Tosyn_Obj
+Pocase_Abs +Posyn_Obj
+Socase_Abl +Socase_Dat +Sosyn_Advl
+Decase_Ala +Desyn_Advl
+Incase_Ins +Incase_Soc +Insyn_Advl
+Besyn_Iobj +Besem_Hum
+Prcase_Abs
+Recase_Dat

LEXICON Root

Adjectives ;
Adverbs ;
Nouns ;
Postposition ;
Propernouns ;
Pronouns ;
Verbs ;
Numerals ;
Conjunctions ;
Punctuation ;

LEXICON CASES
: # ;
: SgCases1 ;
: SgCases2 ;
: SgCases3 ;
: PlCases1 ;
: PlCases2 ;

LEXICON SgCases1 

+Sg+Abs: # ; !-ak
+Sg+Erg:%>k # ; !-ek
+Sg+Dat:%>ri # ; !-ei

+Sg+PGen:%>ren # ; !-en
+Sg+Ins:%>z # ; !-ez, taz, etaz
+Sg+Soc:%>rekin # ; !-ekin
+Sg+Ben:%>rentzat # ; !-entzat
+Sg+Ben2:%>rengatik # ; !-agatik !-engatik

LEXICON SgCases2
+Sg+Ine:%>n # ; !-ean !-etan
!twolc rule - larunbata - larunbatean // isn't the lemma 'larunbat' here ? 
+Sg+All:%>ra # ; !-era !-etara
+Sg+Ela:%>tik # ; !-etik !-etatik

LEXICON SgCases3

+Sg+LGen:%>ko # ; !-eko !-etako


LEXICON PlCases1 

+Pl+Abs:%>k # ;
+Pl+Erg:%>ek # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ei # ;

+Pl+PGen:%>en # ; 
+Pl+Ins:%>ez # ; 
+Pl+Soc:%>ekin # ;
+Pl+Ben:%>entzat # ;
+Pl+Ben2:%>engatik # ;

LEXICON PlCases2 

+Pl+Ine:%>tan # ;
+Pl+All:%>etara # ;
+Pl+Ela:%>etatik # ;

LEXICON PlCases3 

+Pl+LGen:%>etako # ;


LEXICON MggCases1 

+Abs: # ;
+Erg:%>k # ; !k
+Dat:%>ri # ; !i

+PGen:%>ren # ; !en
+Ins:%>z # ; !ez,etaz,taz
+Soc:%>rekin # ; !ekin
+Ben:%>rentzat # ; !entzat
+Ben2:%>rengatik # ; !engatik

+Par:%>rik # ;

LEXICON MggCases2

+Ine:%>etan # ; !tan
+All:%>etara # ; !tara
+Ela:%>etatik # ; !tatik


LEXICON MggCases3

+LGen:%>etako # ; !tako
+LGen:%>eko # ;



LEXICON Propcases 

+Abs: # ; 
+Erg:%>ek # ; ! -k
+Dat:%>i # ; ! -ri

+Ine:%>n # ; ! -en
+All:%>ra # ; ! -a
+Ela:%>tik # ; !-dik
+LGen:%>ko # ; !-go
+LGen:%>go # ; !-go


+PGen:%>ren # ; !-en
+Ins:%>ez # ; !-z, taz, etaz
+Soc:%>ekin # ; !-rekin
+Ben:%>entzat # ; !-rentzat
+Ben2:%>engatik # ; !-rengatik


LEXICON PronSgCases 

+Abs: # ; !-ak
+Erg:%>k # ; !-ek
+Dat:%>ri # ; !-ei

+PGen:%>re # ; !-en
+Ins:%>z # ; !-ez, taz, etaz
+Soc:%>rekin # ; !-ekin
+Ben:%>rentzat # ; !-entzat
+Ben2:%>rengatik # ; !-agatik !-engatik

LEXICON PronReg 

+Abs:%>a # ; !-ak
+Erg:%>ak # ; !-ek
+Dat:%>ari # ; !-ei

+PGen:%>aren # ; !-en
+Ins:%>z # ; !-ez, taz, etaz
+Soc:%>arekin # ; !-ekin
+Ben:%>arentzat # ; !-entzat
+Ben2:%>arengatik # ; !-agatik !-engatik




LEXICON Bizidun !after animate noun phrases

+Biz: SgCases1 ;
+Biz: PlCases1 ;
+Biz:%>gan SgCases2 ;
+Biz:%>rengan PlCases2 ;

LEXICON Bizidun2 !after animate noun phrases

+Biz: MggCases1 ;
+Biz:%>rengan MggCases2 ;

!LEXICON Loccases
!
!+Ela:%>dik # ; !"from"
!+All:%>a # ; ! ; !"to"
!+Term:%>aino # ; !"as far as, up to"
!+Ten:%>antz # ; ! ; !"toward"
!
!LEXICON Precases !nouns that can denote a location, they can take another case in addition
!
!+Sg+Term:%>raino # ; !Terminal ; !"as far as"
!+Sg+Gen:%>ko # ;
!+Sg+XXX:%>koa # ;
!+Sg+Ten:%>rantz # ; !Tendential ; !"toward"


!for propernouns ending in a consonant

!LEXICON Dim
!+Dim:%>txo Cases ; !tto, no

LEXICON Nreg

+N: # ;
+N: NregCases ;

LEXICON NregCases 

+Sg+Abs:a # ; !-ak
+Sg+Erg:%>ak # ; !-ek
+Sg+Dat:%>ari # ; !-ei

+Sg+PGen:%>aren # ; !-en
+Sg+Ins:%>az # ; !-ez, taz, etaz
+Sg+Soc:%>arekin # ; !-ekin
+Sg+Ben:%>arentzat # ; !-entzat
+Sg+Ben2:%>arengatik # ; !-agatik !-engatik
+Sg+Ine:%>an # ; 
+Sg+All:%>ra # ; !-era !-etara
+Sg+Ela:%>atik # ; !-etik !-etatik
+Sg+LGen:%>ko # ; !-eko !-etako
+Pl+Abs:%>ak # ;
+Pl+Erg:%>ek # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ei # ;
+Pl+PGen:%>en # ; 
+Pl+Ins:%>ez # ; 
+Pl+Soc:%>ekin # ;
+Pl+Ben:%>entzat # ;
+Pl+Ben2:%>engatik # ;
+Pl+Ine:%>etan # ;
+Pl+All:%>etara # ;
+Pl+Ela:%>etatik # ;
+Pl+LGen:%>etako # ;
+Abs: # ;
+Erg:%>k # ; !k
+Dat:%>ri # ; !i
+PGen:%>ren # ; !en
+Ins:%>z # ; !ez,etaz,taz
+Soc:%>rekin # ; !ekin
+Ben:%>rentzat # ; !entzat
+Ben2:%>rengatik # ; !engatik
+Par:%>rik # ;
+Ine:%>tan # ; !tan
+All:%>tara # ; !tara
+Ela:%>tatik # ; !tatik
+LGen:%>tako # ; !tako
+LGen:%>ko # ;

LEXICON NregN

+N: NCases ;

LEXICON NregBizi

+N: Bizidun2 ;
+N+Art:%>a Bizidun ;
!+N: Dim ;

LEXICON Na

+N: MggCases1 ;
+N: MggCases2 ;
+N: MggCases3 ;
+N+Art: SgCases1 ;
+N+Art: SgCases2 ;
+N+Art: SgCases3 ;
+N+Art: PlCases1 ;
+N+Art: PlCases2 ;
+N+Art: PlCases3 ;
!+N: Dim ;

LEXICON NaBizi

+N: Bizidun2 ;
+N+Art: Bizidun ;
!+N: Dim ;

LEXICON NpM

+N+Prop+Mal: Propcases ;

LEXICON NpF

+N+Prop+Fem: Propcases ;

LEXICON NpS

+N+Prop+Sur: Propcases ;


LEXICON NpTop

+N+Prop+Plc: Propcases ;

LEXICON NpOrg

+N+Prop+Org: Propcases ;

LEXICON Areg

+A: MggCases1 ;
+A: MggCases2 ;
+A: MggCases3 ;
+A+Art:%>a SgCases1 ;
+A+Art:%>a SgCases2 ;
+A+Art:%>a SgCases3 ;
+A+Art:%>a PlCases1 ;
+A+Art:%>a PlCases2 ;
+A+Art:%>a PlCases3 ;
+Adv+Comp:%>ago # ;
+A+Comp:%>agoa MggCases1 ;
+A+Superl:%>ena MggCases1 ;



LEXICON An

+A: # ;
+A: NCases ;

LEXICON NCases 

+Sg+Abs:a # ; !-ak
+Sg+Erg:%>ak # ; !-ek
+Sg+Dat:%>ari # ; !-ei

+Sg+PGen:%>aren # ; !-en
+Sg+Ins:%>az # ; !-ez, taz, etaz
+Sg+Soc:%>arekin # ; !-ekin
+Sg+Ben:%>arentzat # ; !-entzat
+Sg+Ben2:%>arengatik # ; !-agatik !-engatik
+Sg+Ine:%>ean # ; 
+Sg+All:%>era # ; !-era !-etara
+Sg+Ela:%>atik # ; !-etik !-etatik
+Sg+LGen:%>eko # ; !-eko !-etako
+Pl+Abs:%>ak # ;
+Pl+Erg:%>ek # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ei # ;
+Pl+PGen:%>en # ; 
+Pl+Ins:%>ez # ; 
+Pl+Soc:%>ekin # ;
+Pl+Ben:%>entzat # ;
+Pl+Ben2:%>engatik # ;
+Pl+Ine:%>etan # ;
+Pl+All:%>etara # ;
+Pl+Ela:%>etatik # ;
+Pl+LGen:%>etako # ;
+Abs: # ;
+Erg:%>k # ; !k
+Dat:%>ri # ; !i
+PGen:%>eren # ; !en
+Ins:%>ez # ; !ez,etaz,taz
+Soc:%>erekin # ; !ekin
+Ben:%>erentzat # ; !entzat
+Ben2:%>erengatik # ; !engatik
+Par:%>erik # ;
+Ine:%>etan # ; !tan
+All:%>etara # ; !tara
+Ela:%>etatik # ; !tatik
+LGen:%>etako # ; !tako
+LGen:%>eko # ;

LEXICON AGERTU

+V+Thcase_Abs+Thcase_Ela+Thsyn_Subj+Locase_Ine+Locase_Ala+Losyn_Advl: Tu ;
+V+Thcase_Abs+Thsyn_Subj+Prcase_Abs+Prcase_Soc: Tu ;
+V+Agcase_Erg+Agsyn_Subj+Tocase_Abs+Tosyn_Obj+Recase_Dat: Tu ;

LEXICON AMAITU

+V+Thcase_Abs+Thcase_Ine: Tu ;
+V+Agcase_Erg+Agsyn_Subj+Thcase_Ine+Thsyn_Advl: Tu ;

LEXICON ASMATU

+V+Agcase_Erg+Agsyn_Subj+Pocase_Abs+Posyn_Obj: Tu ;
+V+Agcase_Erg+Agsyn_Subj+Thcase_Abs+Thsyn_Obj: Tu ;

LEXICON ATERA

+V+Agcase_Erg+Agsyn_Subj+Agsem_Ani+Thcase_Abs+Thsyn_Obj+Socase_Abl+Socase_Dat+Sosyn_Advl+Decase_Ala+Desyn_Advl: Sinmas ;
+V+Thcase_Abs+Thsyn_Obj+Socase_Abl+Socase_Dat+Sosyn_Advl+Decase_Ala+Desyn_Advl: Sinmas ;
+V+Locase_Erg+Locase_Abl+Locase_Dat+Thcase_Abs: Sinmas ;

LEXICON DEITU

+V+Agcase_Erg+Agsyn_Subj+Thcase_Abs+Thsyn_Obj+Locase_Ala+Locase_Abl: Tu ;
+V+Agcase_Erg+Agsyn_Subj+Agsem_Hum+Becase_Dat+Besyn_Iobj+Besem_Hum+Locase_Ala+Locase_Abl: Tu ;
+V+Agcase_Erg+Agsyn_Subj+Agsem_Hum+Thcase_Abs+Thcase_Dat+Prcase_Abs: Tu ;

LEXICON EMAN

+V+Agcase_Erg+Argsyn_Subj+Thcase_Abs+Recase_Dat: Sinmas ;
+V+Agcase_Erg+Argsyn_Subj+Thcase_Abs+Thsyn_Obj+Thsem_Time: Sinmas ;
+V+Agcase_Erg+Argsyn_Subj+Decase_Ala+Desyn_Advl: Sinmas ;

LEXCION ETORRI

+V+Thcase_Abs+Socase_Abl+Decase_Ala: ETORRI2 ;
+V+Thcase_Abs+Locase_Abl+Locase_Dat: ETORRI2 ;
+V+Thcase_Abs+Locase_Ine: ETORRI2 ;
+V+Tocase_Abs+Atcase_Abs: ETORRI2 ;

LEXICON HIL
+V+Thcase_Abs+Thsyn_Subj+Thsem_Ani: Sinmas ;
+V+Agcase_Erg+Agsyn_Subj+Pacase_Abs+Pasyn_Obj+Pasem_Ani: Sinmas ;

LEXICON Nouns
afalkide NregBizi ;
aho Nreg ; !"mouth"
aita NaBizi ; !"father"
ama NaBizi ; !"mother"
amnistia Na ; !"amnesty"
apiril NregN ; !"April"
arazo Nreg ; !"problem"
armada Na ;
arrain NregBizi ; !"fish"
aste Nreg ; !"week"
asteazken NregN ; !"Wednesday"
aurreikuspen NregN ; !"forecast"
azken NregN ; !"end"
balio Nreg ; !"value"
bezpera Na ; !"eve"
biltzar Nreg ; !"meeting, council" ORGANIZATION
bizitza Na ; !"life" TIME
boxeolari NregBizi ; !"boxer"
buruzagi NregBizi ; !"head"
celta NaBizi ;
dozenaka Na ; !"dozen"
egun NregN ; !"day"
egunkari Na ; !"newspaper" TEXT
entrenamendu Nreg ;
entrenatzaile NregBizi ;
eraikuntza Na ; !"building"
erro Nreg ; !"root"
errusiar:errusiarr NregN ;
eskola Na ; !"school"
ezberdintasun NregN ; !"unequality"
ferry Nreg ; !"ferry"
garaipen NregN ; !"victory"
gazta Na ;
gazte NregBizi ; !"youth"
harreman NregN ; !"relationship"
hartz NregBizi ; !"bear"
hasiera Na ; !"beginning"
hazkunde Nreg ; !"growth"
herritar NregBizi ;
ibilbide Nreg ;
independentista NregBizi ; !"independentist"
inguru Nreg ; !"surrounding"
intransijentzia Na ;
irabazle NregBizi ; !"winner"
irail NregN ; !"September"
iturri Nreg ; !"source"
jarraitzail NregBizi ; !"supporter"
jokalari NregBizi ; !"player"
kapitain NregBizi ; !"captain"
kargu Nreg ; !"charge"
kirol NregN ; !"sport"
konfiantza Na ;
kontzentrazio Nreg ; !"concentration"
kristau NregBizi ; !"Christian"
lan NregN ; !"work"
lankide NregBizi ;
liburu Nreg ; !"book"
metro Nreg ; ! ; !"meter" 
militar NregBizi ; !"soldier"
nagusitasun NregN ;
neska NaBizi ; !"girl"
obra Na ;
odol NregN ; !"blood"
ordezkaritza NaBizi ; !"delegation"
ordezkari NregBizi ; !"delegate"
ostegun NregN ;
otoitz Nreg ; !"prayer"
otsail NregN ; !"February"
perla Na ; !"pearl"
polizia Na ; !"police"
presidente NregBizi ; !"president"
salaketa Na ;
txakur NregBizi ; !"dog"
tiro Nreg ; !"shot"
sarrera Na ; !"entrance"
tribunal NregN ; 
uda Na ; !"summer"
uharte Nreg ; !"island"
uztail NregN ; !"July"
LEXICON Propernouns
Arkaitz NpM ; !"Arkaitz"
Danel NpM ; !"Danel"
Tristan NpM ; !"Tristan"
Iñaki NpM ; !"Iñaki"
Julen NpM ; !"Julen"
Gorka NpM ; !"Gorka"
Bittor NpM ; !"Bittor"
Iker NpM ; !"Iker"
Milosevic NpM ; !"Milosevic"
Howard NpM ; !"Howard"
Josu NpM ; !"Josu"
David NpM ; !"David"
Tomas NpM ; !"Tomas"
Julen NpM ; !"Julen"
Jason NpM ; !"Jason"
Mari NpM ; !"Mari"
Yoshiro NpM ;
Joseba NpM ;
Garbiñe NpF ; !"Garbiñe"
Linda NpF ; !"Linda"
Naiara NpF ; !"Naiara"
Ainhoa NpF ; !"Ainhoa"
Edurne NpF ; !"Edurne"
Nora NpF ; !"Nora"
Miren NpF ; !"Miren"
Molly NpF ; !"Molly"
Veronica NpF ; !"Veronica"
Lara NpF ; !"Lara"
Nerea NpF ; !"Nerea"
Laraitz NpF ; !"Laraitz"
Maite NpF ; !"Maite"
Mireia NpF ; !"Mireia"
Arantxa NpF ; !"Arantxa"
Olaia NpF ; !"Olaia"
Raquel NpF ; !"Raquel"
Joana NpF ;
Uranga NpS ; !"Uranga"
Zubia NpS ; !"Zubia"
Clinton NpS ; !"Clinton"
Garbajo NpS ; !"Garbajo"
Millar NpS ; !"Millar"
Meabe NpS ; !"Meabe"
Fernandez NpS ; !"Fernandez"
Moreno NpS ; !"Moreno"
Guerrero NpS ; !"Guerrero"
Aierbe NpS ; !"Aierbe"
Winstone NpS ;
Gonzalez NpS ;
Mori NpS ;
Bush NpS ;
Garzon NpS ;
Aranberri NpS ;
Arrate NpS ;
Meabe NpS ;
Frantzia NpTop ; !"France"
Grezia NpTop ; !"Greece"
Japonia NpTop ; !"Japan"
Polonia NpTop ; !"Poland"
Suitza NpTop ; !"Switzerland"
Txekia NpTop ; !"Czech Republic"
Gipuzkoa NpTop ; !"Guipuzcoa"
Baiona NpTop ; !"Bayonne"
Bidasoa NpTop ; !"Bidasoa" 
Donostia NpTop ; !"San Sebastian"
Errenteria NpTop ; !"Renteria"
Getaria NpTop ; !"Guetaria"
Zuberoa NpTop ; !"Soule"
Miarritz NpTop ; !"Miarritz"
Serbia NpTop ; !"Serbia"
Miami NpTop ; !"Miami"
Europa NpTop ;
Ebro NpTop ;
Athletice NpOrg ;
Auzitegi% Gorenak NpOrg ; !"Supreme Court"
EEBB NpOrg ;
EHU NpOrg ; !"University of the Basque Country"
ETA NpOrg ; !"ETA"
Pentagono NpOrg ; !"Pentagon"
RIRA NpOrg ; !"Real Irish Republican Army"
UPV NpOrg ; !"University of the Basque Country"
Real NpOrg ;
LEXICON Verbs
agertu:ager AGERTU ; !"appear"
amaitu:amai AMAITU ; !"finnish"
asmatu:asma ASMATU ; !"invent"
atera ATERA ; !"go out"
deitu:dei DEITU ; !"call"
eman EMAN ; !"give" 
hil HIL ; !"die"
